Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5230YC (4) 91 je/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. Adopt a policy prohibiting an 3 institution of higher education under its control from entering 4 into an employment contract on or after July 1, 2026, with an 5 individual who is a holder of a valid federal H-1B visa and who 6 is also a citizen of the Peopleâs Republic of China. 7